Washington statutes.
RCW 35.45.180

Transfer from general fund to local improvement fund authorized—Ordinance.

Any city or town, when authorized by ordinance, may transfer permanently or temporarily, money from its general fund, or from any other municipal fund as its council shall specify in that ordinance, to its local improvement guaranty fund or any of its local improvement funds to be used for the purposes of these local improvement funds, including the payment of bonds, interest coupons, warrants, or other short-term obligations. The powers granted by this section are to be exercised at the discretion of a council when found to be in the public interest, but money transferred by means of these powers shall not be pledged to the payment of any local improvement district obligations.

[ 2003 c 139 s 1.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2003 c 139: "This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect immediately [May 7, 2003]." [ 2003 c 139 s 4.]